Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1211
Communications facility, defined.

Communications facility means the set of equipment and network components including wires, cables, and associated facilities used by a cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522(5), as such section existed on January 1, 2019, a telecommunications carrier as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(51), as such section existed on January 1, 2019, a provider of information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(24), as such section existed on January 1, 2019, or a wireless services provider, to provide communications services, including cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(8), as such section existed on January 1, 2019, an information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(24), as such section existed on January 1, 2019, wireless services, or other one-way or two-way communications service.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 11.